lrec2010_examples/ser.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund GV1 GV2 GV3
LEXICON Root
ser Verb1;


!Verbs ending in ar
LEXICON Verb1
soy+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:soy #;
eres+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:eres #;
es+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:es #;
somos+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:somos #;
sois+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:sois #;
son+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:son #;

era+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:era #;
eras+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:eras #;
era+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:era #;
éramos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:éramos #;
erais+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:erais #;
eran+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:eran #;

fui+V+1p+sg+tPret:fui #;
fuiste+V+2p+sg+tPret:fuiste #;
fue+V+3p+sg+tPret:fue #;
fuimos+V+1p+pl+tPret:fuimos #;
fuisteis+V+2p+pl+tPret:fuisteis #;
fueron+V+3p+pl+tPret:fueron #;

seré+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:seré #;
serás+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:serás #;
será+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:será #;
seremos+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:seremos #;
seréis+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:seréis #;
serán+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:serán #;

sería+V+1p+sg+mCond:sería #;
serías+V+2p+sg+mCond:serías #;
sería+V+3p+sg+mCond:sería #;
seríamos+V+1p+pl+mCond:seríamos #;
seríais+V+2p+pl+mCond:seríais #;
serían+V+3p+pl+mCond:serían #;

sea+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:sea #;
seas+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:seas #;
sea+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:sea #;
seamos+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:seamos #;
seáis+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:seáis #;
sean+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:sean #;

fuera+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:fuera #;
fueras+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:fueras #;
fuera+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:fuera #;
fuéramos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:fuéramos #;
fuerais+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:fuerais #;
fueran+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:fueran #;
fuese+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:fuese #;
fueses+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:fueses #;
fuese+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:fuese #;
fuésemos+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:fuésemos #;
fueseis+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:fueseis #;
fuesen+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:fuesen #;

fuere+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:fuere #;
fueres+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:fueres #;
fuere+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:fuere #;
fuéremos+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:fuéremos #;
fuereis+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:fuereis #;
fueren+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:fueren #;

sido+V+pastPart:sido #;

siendo+V+Gerund:siendo #;
